Washington statutes.
RCW 23.95.300

Permitted names.

(1) The name of a domestic entity and the name under which a foreign entity may register to do business in this state , must be distinguishable on the records of the secretary of state from any:

(a) Name of an existing domestic entity which at the time is not administratively dissolved;

(b) Name of a foreign entity registered to do business in this state under Article 5 of this chapter;

(c) Name reserved under RCW 23.95.310; or

(d) Name registered under RCW 23.95.315.

(2) If an entity consents in a record to the use of its name and submits an undertaking in a form satisfactory to the secretary of state to change its name to a name that is distinguishable on the records of the secretary of state from any name in any category of names in subsection (1) of this section, the name of the consenting entity may be used by the person to which the consent was given.

(3) A name may not be considered distinguishable on the records of the secretary of state from the name of another entity by virtue of:

(a) A variation in the words, phrases, or abbreviations indicating the type of entity, such as "corporation," "corp.," "incorporated," "Inc.," "company," "co.," "social purpose corporation," "SPC," "S.P.C.," "professional corporation," "PC," "P.C.," "professional service," "PS," "P.S.," "Limited," "Ltd.," "limited partnership," "LP," "L.P.," "limited liability partnership," "LLP," "L.L.P.," "registered limited liability partnership," "RLLP," "R.L.L.P.," "limited liability limited partnership," "LLLP," "L.L.L.P.," "registered limited liability limited partnership," "RLLLP," "R.L.L.L.P.," "limited liability company," "LLC," "L.L.C.," "professional limited liability company," "PLLC," or "P.L.L.C.";

(b) The addition or deletion of an article or conjunction such as "the" or "and" from the same name;

(c) Punctuation, capitalization, or special characters or symbols in the same name; or

(d) Use of abbreviation or the plural form of a word in the same name.

(4) An entity name may not contain language stating or implying that the entity is organized for a purpose other than those permitted by the entity's public organic record.

(5) This chapter does not control the use of assumed business names or "trade names."

(6) An entity may use a name that is not distinguishable from a name described in subsection (1) of this section if the entity delivers to the secretary of state a certified copy of a final judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction establishing the right of the entity to use the name in this state.

(7) An entity may use the name, including the fictitious name, of another entity that is used in this state if the other entity is formed or authorized to transact business in this state and the proposed user entity:

(a) Has merged with the other entity; or

(b) Has been formed by reorganization of the other entity.

[ 2015 c 176 s 1301.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.